District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-142

“Director of the Department of Human Services” defined.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 11, 1939, ch. 601, § 12
Aug. 8, 1946, 60 Stat. 922, ch. 871, § 2
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 904, 49 DCR 5306

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-128.
1973 Ed., § 6-119j.

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.